Washington statutes.
RCW 19.240.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Gift card" means a record as described in subsection (5)[(2)] of this section in the form of a card, or a stored value card or other physical medium, containing stored value primarily intended to be exchanged for consumer goods and services.

(b) "Gift card" does not include prepaid telephone calling cards or prepaid commercial mobile radio services as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3.

(2)(a) "Gift certificate" means an instrument evidencing a promise by the seller or issuer of the record that consumer goods or services will be provided to the bearer of the record to the value or credit shown in the record and includes gift cards.

(b) "Gift certificate" does not include prepaid telephone calling cards or prepaid commercial mobile radio services as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3.

(3) "Bearer" means a person with a right to receive consumer goods and services under the terms of a gift certificate, without regard to any fee, expiration date, or dormancy or inactivity charge.

(4) "Issue" means to sell or otherwise provide a gift certificate to any person, and includes reloading or adding value to an existing gift certificate.

(5) "Stored value" has the same meaning as the term "closed loop prepaid access" defined in RCW 19.230.010.

[ 2019 c 376 s 1; 2011 c 213 s 1; 2004 c 168 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 376: See note following RCW 19.240.020.